Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.630

Youth court dispositions.

(1) Youth court dispositional options include those delineated in RCW 13.40.080, and may also include:

(a) Participating in law-related education classes, appropriate counseling, treatment, or other education [educational] programs;

(b) Providing periodic reports to the youth court;

(c) Participating in mentoring programs;

(d) Serving as a participant in future youth court proceedings;

(e) Writing apology letters; or

(f) Writing essays.

(2) Youth courts shall not impose a term of confinement or detention. Youth courts may require that the youth pay reasonable fees to participate in youth court and in classes, counseling, treatment, or other educational programs that are the disposition of the youth court.

(3) A youth court disposition shall be completed within one hundred eighty days from the date of referral.

(4) Pursuant to RCW 13.40.080(1), a youth court disposition shall be reduced to writing and signed by the youth and his or her parent, guardian, or legal custodian accepting the disposition terms.

(5) [A] youth court shall notify the juvenile court upon successful or unsuccessful completion of the disposition.

(6) [A] youth court shall notify the prosecutor or probation counselor of a failure to successfully complete the youth court disposition.

[ 2002 c 237 s 14.]